Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2011
Immunity from liability.

Any school or any person acting on behalf of a school shall be immune from civil and criminal liability for any acts or omissions which occur as a result of the requirements of the Missing Children Identification Act.

Laws 1987, LB 599, § 11.